Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 4. Buses and Trucks

§ 1301.
Emergency exits.

The owner of a motor bus, designed to carry more than seven passengers and having a closed body, shall not operate such bus or permit the same to be operated, unless it has an exit in the rear end or an exit at the rear on the opposite side from the front door thereof through which passengers may pass in case of emergency.

§ 1302.
Rubber tires on trucks; number of trailers.

Motor trucks shall be equipped with rubber tires.

Not more than one trailer shall be attached to one motor truck. However, two vehicles may be towed in driveaway-towaway operations, including double saddlemount, if the operations conform with the safety regulations of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration relative to coupling devices and towing methods as set forth in 49 C.F.R. §§ 393.70 and 393.71, as amended. As used in this section, “driveaway-towaway operations” means any operation in which any motor vehicle or motor vehicles, new or used, constitute the commodity being transported, when one set or more of wheels of any such motor vehicle or motor vehicles are off the roadway during the course of transportation, whether or not any such motor vehicle furnishes the motive power.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways and those classes of qualifying Federal-aid Primary System highways as designated by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Transportation, commercial motor vehicle combinations consisting of a truck tractor and two trailing units may be operated with the approval of the Vermont Secretary of Transportation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 62

, § 1, eff. April 30, 1963;

1983, No. 74

, § 1, eff. April 28, 1983;

1983, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 200;

2021, No. 20

, § 244.

§ 1303.
Flares required.

A person shall not operate a motor truck, except those registered at pleasure car rates and those registered with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 10,001 pounds, with or without a trailer or semi-trailer attached, or a motor bus, upon a highway outside the lighted area of a town or city, unless there shall be carried in such vehicle, ready at all hours for instant use, three electric flares or three reflector type flares of a type approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. However, if the vehicle is used in the transportation of hazardous material as defined in

5 V.S.A. § 2001(a)(1)

, three electric flares or three reflector type flares of a type specified in this section shall be carried.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 21, 2002.

§ 1304.
Use.

If such vehicle is disabled so that it is necessary that it remain on the roadway or shoulder of the highway, the driver or other person in charge of such vehicle shall cause operating flares to be placed upon the roadway or shoulder of the highway, one approximately 100 feet in front of such vehicle, one approximately 100 feet to the rear, and one on the traffic side of the vehicle.
Such flares shall remain in place until such vehicle is removed from the roadway or shoulder.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

1981, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1305.
Mirror required.

All motor trucks and motor vehicles towing a trailer or semi-trailer shall be equipped with a mirror not less than five inches in diameter or with less than 25 square inches of reflective area so attached that the driver shall at all times have a reflected view of other vehicles approaching from the rear. The mirror shall be attached in a manner that complies with the width requirements of section 1431 of this title. The extended rear-view mirror shall be retracted or removed when not towing a trailer or semi-trailer.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 18

, § 1, eff. May 8, 2001.

§ 1306.
Rear wheel flaps.

No person may operate or cause to be operated any bus, truck, trailer, or semi-trailer upon any highway in this State unless the bus, truck, trailer, or semi-trailer is equipped with suitable metal protectors or substantial flexible flaps behind the rearmost wheels to prevent, as far as practicable, the wheels from throwing dirt, water, or any other materials on the windshields of vehicles following or approaching. The flaps shall be of a type and size as specified by the Department of Motor Vehicles. However, this section shall not apply to farm tractors or pole trailers.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 105

, §§ 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1959; amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1307.
Brake equipment required.

Every motor vehicle, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes acting on all wheels adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold such vehicle, including two separate means of applying the brakes to at least two wheels. If those two separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two wheels.

Motorcycles and motor-driven cycles need only to be equipped with at least one brake that may be operated by hand or foot.

Farm-type tractors and motorized highway building equipment required to be registered need not have brakes on the wheels of the front axle.

Trucks and truck-tractors having three or more axles:

manufactured before July 25, 1980 need not have brakes on the front wheels;

manufactured between July 24, 1980 and October 27, 1986, if any brake components have been removed, must be retrofitted to replace any brake components so that the vehicle meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, within one year of May 16, 1990;

manufactured with at least two steerable axles, shall have brakes on at least one steerable axle, except that any such vehicle manufactured after July 1, 1992 shall be equipped with brakes on all wheels.

Trailers, semi-trailers, trailer coaches, or pole trailers of a gross weight not exceeding 3,000 pounds need not have brakes provided the total weight on, and including, the wheels of the trailer, semi-trailer, or pole trailer shall not exceed 40 percent of the gross weight of the towing vehicle when connected to the trailer, semi-trailer, or pole trailer.

Every trailer, semi-trailer, or trailer coach of a gross weight of more than 3,000 pounds but less than 6,000 pounds, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes on the wheels of at least one axle, adequate to control the movement of and to stop and to hold the vehicle and so designed as to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab. The brakes shall be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental break-away of the towed vehicle, the brake thereon shall be automatically applied and remain applied for not less than 15 minutes.

Every trailer, semi-trailer, or trailer coach of a gross weight of 6,000 pounds, or more, when operated upon the highways of this State, shall be equipped with brakes on all wheels adequate to control the movement of and to stop and to hold the vehicle and so designed as to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab. The brakes shall be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental break-away of the towed vehicle, the brakes thereon shall be automatically applied and remain applied for not less than 15 minutes.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a farm trailer with a load that exceeds 3,000 pounds, nor to a motor vehicle manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1931, if the vehicle has brakes on at least two wheels, nor to a trailer coach with two or three axles with a gross weight in excess of 6,000 pounds manufactured prior to January 1, 1977, provided there are brakes on the wheels on one axle of a two-axle trailer coach and brakes on the wheels of two axles of a three-axle trailer coach.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 206

, § 2; amended

1975, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 1, 1976;

1979, No. 46

, § 3, eff. April 26, 1979;

1979, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 9, 1980;

1989, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 16, 1990;

1991, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 47

, § 31.

§ 1308.
Performance ability of brakes.

The service brakes upon any motor truck, truck, and tractor or combination of vehicles shall be adequate to stop such vehicle or vehicles when traveling 20 miles per hour within a distance of 30 feet when upon dry asphalt or concrete pavement surface free from loose material where the grade does not exceed one percent.

Under the conditions contained in subsection (a) of this section, the hand brake shall be adequate to hold such vehicle or vehicles stationary on any grade upon which it is operated.

All braking distances specified in this section shall apply to all vehicles mentioned, whether such vehicles are not loaded or are loaded to the maximum capacity permitted.

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be so adjusted as to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 206

, § 3; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 201.